North Carolina, session 2025, HB1213.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-275(45) reads as rewritten:
"(45) Eighty percent (80%) of the appraised value of a solar energy electric system.
system placed in service before July 1, 2027. For purposes of this subdivision,
the term "solar energy electric system" means all equipment used directly and
exclusively for the conversion of solar energy to electricity. For purposes of
this subdivision, the term "placed in service" means the equipment and
infrastructure required to meet the nameplate capacity of the solar energy
electric system is fully installed and producing usable energy."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2027.
*H1213-v-2*